District of Columbia statutes.
16-1303

Jurisdiction of Superior Court.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia has jurisdiction of all proceedings for the condemnation of real property authorized by subchapters II and III of this chapter with full power to hear and determine all issues of law and fact that may arise in the proceedings.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(2)
Community development, acquisition of property, see § 6-1005.
Eminent domain, jurisdiction, see § 16-1303.
1981 Ed., § 16-1303.
1973 Ed., § 16-1303.